Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-553
Additional proof required; suspend license and registration until furnished.

Whenever any proof of financial responsibility, filed under the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569, no longer fulfills the purposes for which required, the department shall, for the purpose of sections 60-501 to 60-569, require other proof as required by sections 60-501 to 60-569 and shall suspend the license and registration or the nonresident's operating privilege pending the filing of such other proof.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 53, p. 500.